District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.03

Appropriations.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated such District funds as may be necessary and available to implement the provisions of this chapter, including funds for the development, and the support, of community-based services for persons with intellectual disabilities.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 603, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(z), 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 26(q), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(uu), 59 DCR 5567

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1983.
1973 Ed., § 6-1697.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “persons with mental retardation” for “mentally retarded persons”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “intellectual disabilities” for “mental retardation” at the end.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(j) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(j) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834) and § 4(j) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(z) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.